Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SIBLEY COUNTY ROAD 166 EXTENSION; APPROPRIATION AND BOND SALE AUTHORIZATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $4,037,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds account in the state transportation fund to the commissioner of transportation for one or more grants to the city of Arlington, Sibley County, or both for preliminary design, design, environmental analysis, right-of-way acquisition, and construction of intersection improvements, water main and sewer improvements, and an extension of Sibley County Road 166, known as Freedom Drive, from Sibley County State-Aid Highway 17 to marked Trunk Highway 5 in the city of Arlington. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $4,037,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end